Tennessee, session 114, SB2414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-106, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) By February 1 of each year, the department of health shall report to the
chairs of the senate health and welfare committee and the committee in the house of
representatives with jurisdiction over public health programs concerning the benefits and
grants received by this state as described in this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2414
012722
- 1 -